Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1823
Compulsory inspection and grading; special permits; application; issuance.

In any area designated for compulsory inspection and grading by order of the director pursuant to the provisions of sections 2-1813 to 2-1825, special permits may be issued authorizing shipment of uninspected potatoes when an official inspection cannot be made. Application to the director for special permits authorizing shipment must establish an emergency in which delay may cause substantial financial injury to the applicant.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 15, p. 191.